Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-821
Domestic health and accident associations; deposit required.

No domestic assessment association organized after August 24, 1941, shall be authorized to transact the business of health or accident insurance until it has deposited with the Department of Insurance the sum of ten thousand dollars in cash or securities as described in subdivision (4) of section 44-319.01.

Laws 1941, c. 89, § 1, p. 342;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-807;

R.S.1943, § 44-821;

Laws 1957, c. 189, § 4, p. 663;

Laws 1959, c. 211, § 1, p. 731;

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 63.